Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-303 Institutions. A society may
create, maintain and operate, or may establish organizations to operate,
not-for-profit institutions to further the purposes permitted by section
432:2-107(a)(2). Such institutions may furnish services free or at a
reasonable charge. Any real or personal property owned, held or leased by the
society for this purpose shall be reported in every annual statement. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next